Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 1 STATE BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS
36-1-147. Geothermal leases.

The state board of land commissioners may lease any portion of the land of the state, or any interest therein, for the purposes of exploring for, producing, and developing the geothermal resources thereunder at a rental to be determined by the board, except as provided in sections 36-1-113, 36-1-118, and 36-1-147.5.

The geothermal leasing arrangements authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall include provision for:

The filing of a surety bond to assure compliance with the lease terms and the requirements of article 90.5 of title 37, C.R.S.;

Royalties on both the geothermal resource and its by-product;

The protection of the environment, including but not necessarily limited to the air quality, the ground and surface water quality, and the land surface, as well as the rest of the environment.

The geothermal leasing arrangements authorized by subsection (1) of this section are to be administered by the state board of land commissioners in a manner which encourages the maximum economic recovery of geothermal resources, prevents waste of said resources, and protects the public interest in the lands of the state by requiring the exploration for the development and protection of geothermal resources to proceed in an environmentally acceptable manner.

All existing leases on state lands for the development of geothermal resources are hereby validated as though they had been issued pursuant to the authority of this article.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 315, § 6, effective May 17.

L. 83:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1424, § 4, effective June 10.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 620, § 2, effective August 3.

36-1-147.5. Leasing arrangements for renewable energy resources development - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that some of the public lands under the direction, control, and disposition of the state board of land commissioners are viable for development of renewable energy resources and therefore are of unique economic value to the state for the funding of public schools.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Biomass" means:

Nontoxic plant matter consisting of agricultural crops or their by-products, urban wood waste, mill residue, slash, or brush;

Animal wastes and products of animal wastes; or

Methane produced at landfills or as a by-product of the treatment of wastewater residuals.

"Renewable energy resources" means energy derived from solar, wind, geothermal, biomass, and hydroelectricity. A fuel cell using hydrogen derived from these eligible resources is also an eligible electric generation technology. Fossil and nuclear fuels and their derivatives are not eligible resources.

The state board of land commissioners shall examine property currently under the direction, control, and disposition of the board to identify land suitable and appropriate for development of renewable energy resources. In identifying such property, the board shall collaborate with the national renewable energy laboratory, university of Colorado, Colorado state university, and Colorado school of mines. The board shall also work with federal land management agencies to pursue any state and federal collaboration for the development of renewable energy resources.

Repealed.

The state board of land commissioners shall collaborate with the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101, C.R.S., to ensure that potential renewable energy resource developers are aware of any lands identified by the board as being suitable for development of renewable energy resources.

The state board of land commissioners may lease any portion of the land of the state, or any interest therein, for the purposes of developing renewable energy resources at a rental to be determined by the board, except as provided in sections 36-1-113, 36-1-118, and 36-1-147.

The leasing arrangements for renewable energy resources development authorized by subsection (5) of this section shall include provisions for:

Royalties on the energy produced through the renewable energy resources; and

The protection of the environment, including but not limited to wildlife habitat, air quality, ground and surface water quality, and land surface.

All existing leases on state lands for the development of renewable energy resources are hereby validated as though they had been issued pursuant to the authority of this section.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added and (3) amended, pp. 621, 622, §§ 3, 4, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(4) amended, p. 72, § 12, effective March 18.

L. 2010:

(3)(c) added, (HB 10-1349), ch. 387, p. 1816, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 2012:

(4) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 976, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1699, § 112, effective August 7.

36-1-148. Land and water management fund.

There is hereby created the state board of land commissioners land and water management fund. Such fund is to be generated from fees collected under the provisions of section 36-1-112. The fund is to be under the control of and to be administered by the state board of land commissioners. The fund is to be used only for the management and the improvement of state-owned lands and waters under the control of the state board of land commissioners. Each such improvement or management program is to be for the purpose of complying with the provisions of sections 9 and 10 of article IX of the state constitution; except that, for each such improvement made to state-owned lands utilized for agricultural purposes, the lessee shall contribute no less than twenty percent of the cost of such improvement, by written agreement with the state board of land commissioners.

The state treasurer shall establish such fund from fees submitted pursuant to section 36-1-112. All such fees submitted shall be credited to such fund. Expenditures from such fund shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars in any fiscal year. Any balance in said fund at the close of a fiscal year in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars shall revert to the general fund, and the board shall reduce its fees accordingly.

The controller shall authorize disbursements from said fund as directed by the state board of land commissioners on receipt of a voucher from said commissioners stating that the disbursement is to accomplish a purpose set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

and (5) Repealed.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1347, § 3, effective July 1; (5) added by revision, p. 1347, §§ 4, 5.

L. 83:

(4) amended, p. 844, § 76, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 89:

(5) amended, p. 1415, § 2, effective April 6.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 1911, § 3, effective March 4.

L. 95:

(5) repealed, p. 457, § 2, effective May 16.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 1222, § 21, effective August 7.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 851, § 36, effective May 21.

L. 2002:

(4) repealed, p. 880, § 13, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to the recreation and reenactment of this section on May 3, 1985, subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 1985. (See L. 79, p. 1347.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

36-1-149. Cultivation of state land - legislative declaration.

In no case shall a lessee of state land be allowed to convert native grassland to cultivated land so long as the federal government has in place incentives intended to encourage the reduction of the amount of land under cultivation when such incentive is applicable in Colorado.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a lessee who wishes to convert native grassland to cultivated land on a single parcel of state land which is twenty-five acres or less in size and which is contiguous to other land owned or leased by that lessee which is being cultivated at the time of the proposed conversion.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that this section is enacted to assure that this state's grasslands and topsoil, invaluable and nonrenewable resources, are protected and preserved for future generations. Additionally, this section is enacted to further the national and state interest in maintaining the highest price levels for agricultural products by reducing the amount of land under cultivation and thereby reducing the supply of such products. In furthering this national and state interest, the state is also assuring that existing and future leases of state land will continue to provide the maximum possible revenue to the state.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1293, § 1, effective June 20.

36-1-150. Conservation easements.

The state board of land commissioners may sell or lease conservation easements, licenses, or other similar interests in land in accordance with the provisions of sections 9 and 10 of article IX of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 851, § 37, effective May 21.

36-1-151. Public schools - access to state lands.

The state board of land commissioners shall allow access to state trust lands by public schools without charge for outdoor educational purposes so long as such access does not conflict with uses previously approved by the board on such lands.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 851, § 37, effective May 21.

36-1-152. Public school districts - charter schools - lease, purchase, or other use of state lands.

The state board of land commissioners shall provide opportunities for public school districts within which school trust lands are located to lease, purchase, or otherwise use such lands or portions thereof as are necessary for school building sites, at an amount to be determined by the board, which shall not exceed the appraised fair market value, which amount may be paid over time.

The state board of land commissioners may provide opportunities for charter schools that are authorized by school districts pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, C.R.S., or charter schools that are authorized by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22, C.R.S., to lease, purchase, or otherwise use school trust lands, or portions thereof, for school building sites. Prior to such lease, purchase, or other use of school trust lands by a charter school, the charter school shall notify the school district in which the land is located that the charter school is seeking to lease, purchase, or otherwise use state trust lands located within that school district for school building sites for the charter school. The state board of land commissioners shall request written comment from the school district in which the school trust lands that may be leased, purchased, or otherwise used by a charter school are located, indicating the impact such lease, purchase, or use will have on the school district. The board shall determine the amount a charter school shall be required to pay to lease, purchase, or otherwise use said lands, which amount shall not exceed the appraised fair market value and may be paid over time.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 852, § 37, effective May 21.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-022), ch. 246, p. 1110, § 3, effective May 14.

36-1-153. Investment and development fund.

There is hereby created the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund pursuant to section 36-1-116 (1)(b)(II). Any balance in the fund at the close of a fiscal year and any interest earned on moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not revert to the permanent school fund. The fund is to be under the control of and to be administered by the state board of land commissioners. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the state board for the purposes set forth in this section.

Money in the fund shall be used at the discretion of the state board of land commissioners to hire staff, contract for services, make purchases, make annual payments on any financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements the state board instructed the state treasurer to enter into as allowed in section 36-1-118.5, and take such other actions as the state board deems appropriate to provide for the development of additional value-added benefit for the state's trust lands, including both portfolio enhancement and additional income. Such actions may include, but are not limited to, the rezoning, platting, master planning, or other development activities that increase the value of or rate of return from the state's trust lands. The state board of land commissioners may also use up to one million dollars per fiscal year of the money in the fund for asset maintenance, including, but not limited to, upkeep and replacement of buildings, agricultural sprinklers, fences, windmills, and water wells.

The state board of land commissioners shall notify the state treasurer in writing of the amount that needs to be transferred from the investment and development fund to the state board of land commissioners financed fund created in section 36-1-118.5 (7), and no later than thirty days after receipt of such notification, the state treasurer shall transfer such sum to the state board of land commissioners financed fund created in section 36-1-118.5 (7).

The controller shall authorize disbursements from the fund as directed by the state board of land commissioners on receipt of a voucher from the state board stating that the disbursement is to accomplish a purpose set forth in this section.

On or before November 1, 2011, and on or before each November 1 thereafter, the state board of land commissioners shall deliver information on the portfolio enhancement and additional income generated as a result of this section, including information detailing the use of the fund for asset maintenance, as specified in section 36-1-102 (8). Each report shall include estimates of the increase in portfolio enhancement and income for the then-current fiscal year and the five succeeding state fiscal years.

and (6) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 537, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2009:

(5) and (6) repealed, (SB 09-022), ch. 246, p. 1111, § 4, effective May 14.

L. 2011:

(4) amended, (SB 11-029), ch. 51, p. 133, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1274), ch. 376, p. 2215, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2015:

(2)(a) and (4) amended, (HB 15-1245), ch. 97, p. 277, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2061, § 75, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1245, see section 1 of chapter 97, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

36-1-153.5. Annual income and inventory report.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before November 1, 2011, and on or before each November 1 thereafter, the state board of land commissioners shall prepare an annual income and inventory report. The report shall include the following:

Data regarding the income earned from lands held in trust by the board, including:

A summary of the total revenues earned during the previous fiscal year from all lands held in trust by the board;

A summary of the total revenues earned during the previous fiscal year from lands in each individual trust held by the board;

A summary of the trends in revenue that have occurred in connection with the lands held in trust by the board; and

A summary of the anticipated growth in revenue and revenue trends in connection with the lands held in trust by the board;

A summary of the state board of land commissioners' land inventory as of the date of the report, including the number of surface acres and subsurface acres in each individual trust held by the board; and

The amount transferred to the public school capital construction assistance fund on the immediately preceding July 1, pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S.

The state board of land commissioners shall deliver the annual income and inventory report as specified in section 36-1-102 (8).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-029), ch. 51, p. 133, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (HB 17-1257), ch. 254, p. 1066, § 10, effective August 9.

36-1-153.7. Commercial real property operating fund - created.

The commercial real property operating fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury and consists of all lease income earned by the state board of land commissioners from commercial real property. The state board of land commissioners shall control and administer the fund. The state controller shall, in cooperation with the state board of land commissioners and the state treasurer, establish accounts in the fund as necessary to ensure the proper accounting for all commercial real property that the state board of land commissioners owns and leases to third parties. Each account must consist of lease revenue, not including any damage deposits as allowed in section 36-1-129, for the commercial real property as separated by trust and must account for all expenses for the commercial real property held by each trust. Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the state board of land commissioners and may be used to contract for the services of a third-party property management firm as specified in subsection (2) of this section, and for any other associated property management and operating costs. Money in the fund may be transferred to the state board of land commissioners financed fund created in section 36-1-118.5 (7). The state board of land commissioners shall notify the state treasurer in writing of the amount that needs to be transferred from the fund to the state board of land commissioners financed fund. The state treasurer shall transfer such amount no later than thirty days after receipt of such notification. All unencumbered and unexpended money in the fund at the end of each quarter in each fiscal year is distributed as specified in section 36-1-116.

The state controller shall authorize disbursements from the fund as directed by the state board of land commissioners on receipt of a voucher from the state board stating that the disbursement is to accomplish a purpose set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

The state board of land commissioners may contract for the services of a third-party property management firm to manage any commercial real property. The state board of land commissioners shall select the third-party property management firm through a competitive bid process. Bids must be evaluated using standard commercial real property management criteria.

The term of any contract with a third-party property management firm that the state board of land commissioners enters into pursuant to this subsection (2) may not exceed three years with an option to renew for one additional year.

Any procurements made by the third-party management firm on behalf of the state board of land commissioners for the management of commercial real property by the third-party management firm authorized in this subsection (2) are exempt from the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.

Pursuant to sections 24-36-103 and 24-36-104, C.R.S., the third-party management firm must maintain lease revenue it collects in a depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., in distinct bank accounts for each trust.

The third-party management firm must produce quarterly management reports that detail the gross revenues and expenses for each commercial real property. The state board of land commissioners shall provide a copy of such management reports, after its review, to the department of natural resources' controller. The third-party management firm shall disburse revenues to the state no less frequently than on a quarterly basis to coincide with the recording of revenues and expenses as directed by the state controller. The revenues transferred to the state shall be net of actual expenses for the commercial real property. The third-party management firm may retain sufficient cash for the working capital needs of the commercial real property.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1274), ch. 376, p. 2215, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2061, § 76, effective July 1.

36-1-154. Severability.

If any provision of this article is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions of this article that can be given effect without such invalid provision.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1317), ch. 381, p. 2073, § 4, effective June 2.